Rhode Island statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Chapter 3.1 Civil Unions

15-3.1-1.
Definitions.

“Certificate of civil union” means a document that certifies that the persons named on the certificate have established a civil union in compliance with this chapter.

“Civil union” means a legal union between two individuals of the same sex established pursuant to this chapter.

“Party to a civil union” means a person who has established a civil union pursuant to this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 198, § 1.

15-3.1-2.
Eligibility.

Persons shall be eligible to enter into a civil union only if both such persons are:

At least eighteen (18) years of age;

Of the same sex;

Not a party to another civil union or a spouse in a marriage with any other person;

Not in a family relationship within the degrees stated in Rhode Island general laws §

15-1-1

or §

15-1-2

; and

Neither person is mentally incompetent at the time of the civil union.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 198, § 1.

15-3.1-3.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 198, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2013, ch. 4, § 6; P.L. 2013, ch. 5, § 6, effective August 1, 2013.

15-3.1-4.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 198, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2013, ch. 4, § 6; P.L. 2013, ch. 5, § 6, effective August 1, 2013.

15-3.1-5.
Conscience and religious organizations protected.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, no religious or denominational organization, no organization operated for charitable or educational purpose which is supervised or controlled by or in connection with a religious organization, and no individual employed by any of the foregoing organizations, while acting in the scope of that employment, shall be required:

To provide services, accommodations, advantages, facilities, goods, or privileges for a purpose related to the solemnization, certification, or celebration of any civil union; or

To solemnize or certify any civil union; or

To treat as valid any civil union;

if such providing, solemnizing, certifying, or treating as valid would cause such organizations or individuals to violate their sincerely held religious beliefs.

No organization or individual as described in subsection (a) above who fails or refuses to provide, solemnize, certify, or treat as valid, as described in subdivision (a)(1), (a)(2) or (a)(3) above, persons in a civil union, shall be subject to a fine, penalty, or other cause of action for such failure or refusal.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 198, § 1.

15-3.1-6.
Benefits, protections, and responsibilities.

A party to a civil union lawfully entered into pursuant to this chapter shall have all the rights, benefits, protections, and responsibilities under law, whether derived from statutes, administrative rules, court decisions, the common law, or any other source of civil or criminal law as people joined together pursuant to chapter 15-3.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 198, § 1.

15-3.1-7.
References and inclusions.

A party to a civil union shall be included in any definition or use of any term that denotes the spousal relationship, whether or not gender specific, as those or related terms designating that relationship are used throughout the laws of the State of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 198, § 1.

15-3.1-8.
Reciprocity.

A civil union or registered domestic partnership that extends benefits and responsibilities without the status of marriage and is legally entered into in another jurisdiction shall be recognized in Rhode Island as a civil union; provided, that the relationship meets the eligibility requirements of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 198, § 1.

15-3.1-9.
Dissolution of civil unions.

The family court, as established by Rhode Island general laws §

8-10-3

, shall have jurisdiction over all proceedings regarding dissolution of civil unions. In all relevant respects, the dissolution of civil unions shall follow the procedures and be subject to the substantive rights and obligations outlined in chapter 15-5.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 198, § 1.

15-3.1-10.
Requirement of department of health — Civil unions.

The department of health, office of vital statistics shall draft and distribute applications for civil unions to every town and city within the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 198, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 501, § 8.

15-3.1-11.
Severability.

If any part of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstance is adjudged invalid, the adjudication or application shall not affect the validity of this act as a whole or any other part.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 198, § 1.

15-3.1-12.
Merger of civil union into marriage by action of the parties.

On and after the effective date of this section, two (2) persons who are parties to a civil union entered into pursuant to this chapter may apply for and be issued a marriage license and have such marriage solemnized pursuant to chapters 15-1 to 15-3 of the general laws, provided such persons are otherwise eligible to marry under chapter 15-1 as amended herein, and the parties to the marriage will be the same as the parties to the civil union. After the solemnization of such marriage, and upon filing of the license and certificate of marriage with the clerk in the town or city from which the license was issued pursuant to §

15-2-1

, of the civil union of such persons shall be merged into the marriage by operation of law as of the date of the recording of the marriage certificate and shall be effective as of the date of the recording of the marriage certificate.

Such parties may also apply to the clerk of the town or city in which their civil union is recorded to have their civil union legally designated and recorded as a marriage, without any additional requirements of payment of marriage licensing fees or solemnization contained in chapters 15-1 to 15-3 of the general laws, provided that such parties’ civil union was not previously dissolved or annulled. Upon application, the parties shall be issued a marriage certificate and the civil union of such persons shall be merged into the marriage by operation of law as of the date of the recording of the marriage certificate and shall be effective as of the date of the recording of the marriage certificate.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 4, § 5; P.L. 2013, ch. 5, § 5.

15-3.1-13.
Recognized date of marriage.

For purposes of determining the legal rights and responsibilities involving individuals who previously entered into a civil union in this state, and whose civil union has merged into a marriage under this chapter, the date of the recording of the marriage certificate shall be the operative date by which legal rights and responsibilities are determined.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 4, § 5; P.L. 2013, ch. 5, § 5.